Illinois, session 104th, HB650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Assessed Clean Energy Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 50/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Property Assessed Clean Energy Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-77, eff. 8-11-17.)